District of Columbia statutes.
47-4439

Other methods not precluded.

The collection remedy under this subchapter shall be in addition to, and not in substitution for, any other remedy available by law.

History

June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 405(b), 48 DCR 334